Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-907.01
Commission; inspection; powers.

The property, books, records, accounts, papers, and proceedings of every grain dealer shall, at all times during business hours, be subject to inspection by the commission.

Laws 1987, LB 507, § 6.